Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 10

Laundries

62-10-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commercial laundry” means any place where laundry work is done for more than ten (10) persons belonging to different families, whether the laundry is operated by hand or power, except hotels in which laundries are maintained for doing the laundry work of guests of the hotel only;

“Laundry plant” means any place where commercial laundry is done;

“Laundry wagon” means any vehicle in which laundry is collected or delivered to or by a commercial laundry; and

“Person” includes persons, firms and corporations.

Acts 1937, ch. 94, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.41 (Williams, § 7182.43); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-1001.

62-10-102. Marking of plants.

Every laundry plant shall be plainly marked with a sign posted upon the building bearing the name of the laundry, if operated under a corporate or trade name, or the name of the proprietor.

Acts 1937, ch. 94, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.45 (Williams, § 7182.47); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-1002.

62-10-103. Water heating facilities.

Every commercial laundry shall be equipped with facilities for heating water to a temperature of at least one hundred ninety degrees Fahrenheit (190° F.).

Acts 1937, ch. 94, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.46 (Williams, § 7182.48); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-1003.

62-10-104. Treatment of hospital laundry.

No laundry received from any hospital for contagious diseases shall be mingled with other laundry until it has been treated with live steam or water heated to a temperature of at least one hundred ninety degrees Fahrenheit (190° F.) for a period of thirty (30) minutes.

Acts 1937, ch. 94, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.47 (Williams, § 7182.49); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-1004.

62-10-105. Marking of wagons.

Every laundry wagon shall be plainly marked with letters at least three inches (3") high, showing the name of the laundry in the business of which the laundry wagon is operated, the marking or lettering to be painted on the vehicle or attached to the laundry wagon or affixed on the laundry wagon in a permanent manner.

Acts 1937, ch. 94, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.42 (Williams, § 7182. 44); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-1005.

62-10-106. Acceptance of laundry only from marked wagons.

No commercial laundry shall accept, directly or indirectly, any laundry from any vehicle operated in the collection of laundry except from a laundry wagon as defined in this chapter. This shall not be construed as preventing any individual from delivering the individual's laundry or the laundry of a member of the individual's household to the laundry plant.

Acts 1937, ch. 94, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.44 (Williams, § 7182.46); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-1006.

62-10-107. Ticket or card with laundry delivered.

No commercial laundry shall deliver any laundry unless there is delivered with the laundry a ticket or card showing the name of the laundry plant at which the laundering was done.

Acts 1937, ch. 94, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.43 (Williams, § 7182.45); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-1007.

62-10-108. Penalty.

A violation of this chapter is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1937, ch. 94, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.48 (Williams, § 7182.50); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-1008; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.